Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4507
Statement obtained out-of-state or by federal law enforcement officer; admissible; when.

Any statement made during a custodial interrogation shall be admissible against such person in a criminal proceeding in this state if:

(1) The statement was obtained in another state and was obtained in compliance with the laws of that state; or

(2) The statement was obtained by a federal law enforcement officer in this state or another state, was obtained in compliance with the laws of the United States, and was not taken by a federal law enforcement officer in an attempt to circumvent sections 29-4501 to 29-4508.

Laws 2008, LB179, § 7.